Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the State Department  of Fish and Wildlife, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for the
following purposes:
(1) Fish Division.............................  $ 20,713,215
(2) Wildlife Division........................  $ 4,856,677
(3) Administrative Services
Division.....................................  $ 4,861,971
(4) Debt service ..............................  $ 1,964,790
(5) Capital improvement.................  $ 155,668
(6) State Police enforcement .......... $ 2,389,141
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and in-
cluding federal funds from  the Pacific Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described in this section, collected or received  by the State De-
partment of Fish and Wildlife, for the following purposes:
(1) Fish Division ............................. $ 78,011,355
(2) Wildlife Division........................ $ 40,569,695
(3) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 50,906,836
(4) Capital improvement................. $ 5,853,864
(5) Debt service .............................. $ 1,836,410
(6) State Police enforcement .......... $ 26,268,532
(7) Major construction and
acquisition................................. $ 257,448
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys  allocated from the Parks and Natural Resources Fund to
Enrolled Senate Bill 5510 (SB 5510-A) Page 1
the State Department of  Fish and Wildlife, for activities and projects to implement Article
XV, section 4 (8), of the Oregon Constitution, for the following purposes:
(1) Fish Division ............................. $ 6,261,822
(2) Wildlife Division........................ $ 1,378,209
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds other than those described in section 2 of this 2019  Act col-
lected or received by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the following purposes:
(1) Fish Division ............................. $  98,376,362
(2) Wildlife Division........................ $ 36,429,181
(3) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 7,610,263
(4) Capital improvement................. $ 3,210,520
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by Senate June 13, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 19, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5510 (SB 5510-A) Page 2